Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4620
Nature of authority created by temporary custody order.

(a) A grant of authority under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623 is temporary and terminates under sections 43-4624 to 43-4627 after the return from deployment of the deploying parent, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order. The grant does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decisionmaking authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom it is granted.

(b) A nonparent granted caretaking authority, decisionmaking authority, or limited contact under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623 has standing to enforce the grant until it is terminated by court order or under sections 43-4624 to 43-4627.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 20.